Missouri, session 2026, HB2571.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.060, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 571.060, to read as follows:
571.060. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful transfer of weapons if he or
she:
(1) Knowingly sells, leases, loans, gives away or delivers a firearm or ammunition for
a firearm to any person who, under the provisions of section 571.070, is not lawfully entitled
to possess such;
(2) Knowingly sells, leases, loans, gives away or delivers a blackjack to a person less
than eighteen years old without the consent of the child's custodial parent or guardian, or
recklessly, as defined in section 562.016, sells, leases, loans, gives away or delivers any
firearm to a person less than eighteen years old without the consent of the child's custodial
parent or guardian; provided, that this does not prohibit the delivery of such weapons to any
peace officer or member of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard while
performing his or her official duty; [or]
(3) Recklessly, as defined in section 562.016, sells, leases, loans, gives away or
delivers a firearm or ammunition for a firearm to a person who is intoxicated; or
(4) Knowingly, in a commercial transaction, sells, leases, loans, or trades a fully
automatic firearm or semi-automatic firearm to any person under twenty years of age,
provided that this does not prohibit the delivery of such weapons to any peace officer or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2571 2
member of the Armed Forces of the United States or National Guard while performing
his or her official duty.
2. A person commits the offense of unlawful transfer of weapons if he or she is
under twenty years of age and knowingly, in a commercial transaction, buys, trades, or
leases a fully automatic firearm or semi-automatic firearm, provided that this does not
prohibit the acceptance of such weapons by any peace officer or member of the Armed
Forces of the United States or National Guard while performing his or her official duty.
3. For purposes of this section, the term "semi-automatic firearm" means any
repeating firearm whose action mechanism automatically loads ammunition into the
chamber and prepares it for subsequent firing but requires a shooter to manually
discharge each shot. The term "semi-automatic firearm" shall include any firearm in
which actuating the trigger or hammer rotates a new chamber in line with the barrel.
4. Unlawful transfer of weapons under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section
is a class E felony; unlawful transfer of weapons under [subdivisions] subdivision (2) [and],
(3), or (4) of subsection 1 of this section or under subsection 2 of this section is a class A
misdemeanor.
✔